Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-403, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-403. As used in the Oklahoma Milk and Milk Products


Act:


1. “Bulk milk hauler/sampler” means any person collecting


official samples who may transport raw milk from a farm or raw milk


products to or from a milk plant, receiving station, or transfer


station and has in his or her possession a permit from any state to


sample these products;


2. “Dairy farm” means any premises owned or operated by a “milk


producer” milk producer where one or more cows or goats are kept,



Req. No. 952 Page 1


and from which a part or all of the milk or milk products is are


sold or offered for sale;


3. “Donkey milk” means the lacteal secretion, practically free


from colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of one or more


healthy donkeys;


4. “Goat milk” means the lacteal secretion, practically free


from colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of one or more


healthy goats;


4. 5. “Grade A milk and milk products” means milk and milk


products at any stage from production through pasteurization and


packaging, that are of the minimum quality and are produced, hauled,


processed, and distributed under conditions which meet the


requirements of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk Products Act;


5. 6. “Inhibitor” means any chemical or antibiotic substance


which inhibits or retards the growth of bacteria in milk;


6. 7. “Milk” means the lacteal secretion, practically free from


colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of one or more healthy


cows, which contains not less than eight and one-fourth percent (8


1/4%) milk solids-not-fat and not less than three and one-fourth


percent (3 1/4%) milk fat. The term “milk” milk shall include


donkey milk, goat milk, fluid market milk, and milk products for the


purpose of distribution to the consumer, and may contain optional


ingredients defined by the State Board of Agriculture and shall


include ungraded and Grade A milk;

Req. No. 952 Page 2


7. 8. “Milk contact surface” means any pipe, tank, equipment,


or facility which contacts or may contact milk during the producing,


transporting, processing, or distributing of milk and milk products;


8. 9. “Milk distribution center” means any premises, owned or


operated by a “milk distributor” milk distributor, which distributes


and sells or offers to sell milk and milk products but does not


include an establishment which sells or offers to sell Grade A milk


and milk products at retail;


9. 10. “Milk facility” means the producing, processing,


transporting, or distributing premises and facilities which operate


under an appropriate and valid permit issued by the Commissioner of


Agriculture, in compliance with the Oklahoma Milk and Milk Products


Act and the rules of the Board;


10. 11. “Milk fat” or “butter fat” means the fat of milk;


11. 12. “Milk plant” means any premises owned or operated by a


“milk processor” milk processor where milk or milk products are


collected, manufactured, processed, pasteurized, bottled, stored, or


prepared for distribution for commercial purposes including, but not


limited to, a receiving or transfer station;


12. 13. “Milk products” means those products produced or


obtained from milk or any component or product of milk and defined


by the Board, including Grade A milk products, ungraded raw milk,


and ungraded milk products;



Req. No. 952 Page 3


13. 14. “Milk tank truck cleaning facility” means any premises


or establishment, separate from a milk plant, receiving station, or


transfer station, where a milk tank truck is cleaned and sanitized;


14. 15. “Milk tank truck driver” means any person transporting


raw or pasteurized milk products between a milk plant, receiving


station, or transfer station;


15. 16. “Milk transportation company” means any person


responsible for a milk tank truck;


16. 17. “Pasteurized milk” means Grade A raw milk which has


been pasteurized and stored in accordance with the chemical,


bacteriological, and temperature standards required by the Board;


17. 18. “Receiving station” means any premises where raw milk


is received, collected, handled, stored, or cooled and prepared for


further transporting;


18. 19. “Retail food store” means any establishment which


offers for retail sale packaged or bulk food goods for human


consumption;


19. 20. “Transfer station” means any establishment or premises


where milk or milk products are transferred directly from one milk


tank truck to another; and


20. 21. “Ungraded milk products” and “manufacture grade milk


products” include, but are not limited to, butter, cheese, dry milk,


condensed milk, filled or evaporated milk, frozen dairy dessert, and


mello-drink products.

Req. No. 952 Page 4


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk


Products Act shall not be construed to:


1. Include incidental sales of raw milk directly to consumers


at the farm where the milk is produced;


2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat milk


or donkey milk; and


3. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using


milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.


B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk


or donkey milk are those sales where the average monthly number of


gallons sold does not exceed one hundred (100).


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-417, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-417. A. No person shall produce, haul, process, or


distribute ungraded raw milk or milk products or hold himself or


herself out as an ungraded milk producer, hauler, processor, or


distributor unless such person possesses an appropriate and valid


permit for the particular premises or facilities concerned. The


processing of permit applications and inspections shall be similar


to the Grade A permit process.


B. A person may produce donkey milk for the use of incidental


sales pursuant to Section 7-414 of this title without obtaining a

Req. No. 952 Page 5


permit; provided, that any producer of donkey milk shall adhere to


the inspection and investigation provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and


Milk Products Act.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-952 MR 1/16/2025 3:12:47 PM





































Req. No. 952 Page 6